Utah statutes.
31A-21-304.   Special cancellation provisions.

Whether or not Section 31A-21-303 is also applicable:

(1)  Section 31A-21-305 applies to cancellation on request of a premium finance company;

(2)  Section 70C-6-304 applies to cancellation upon request of a creditor; and

(3)  Sections 41-12a-404 and 41-12a-405 apply to the cancellation or other termination of insurance coverage or of a surety bond after the insurer or surety has provided a certificate of insurance or suretyship to the Department of Public Safety.

